Hawaii statutes.
§501-217 Limitation of actions. All
actions on contract claims for compensation under this chapter by reason of any
loss or damage or deprivation of land, or any estate or interest therein, shall
be begun within the period of six years from the time when the cause of action
accrued, and not afterwards; provided that the plaintiff in an action for the
recovery of the land or estate or interest therein in accordance with section
501-213, may bring the action on the contract claim within one year after the termination
of that action. The contract claim herein provided shall survive to the
personal representatives of the registered owner, unless barred in the
registered owner's lifetime, but the proceeds thereof shall be treated as real
estate. [L 1903, c 56, §103; RL 1925, §3293; RL 1935, §5104; RL 1945, §12704;
RL 1955, §342-104; HRS §501-217; am L 1972, c 91, §1(qq); am L 2006, c 38, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next